Tennessee, session 114, SB1104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1316(c), is amended by
adding the following new subdivision:
(5) The gun dealer shall ensure that three (3) days have passed since the
transaction was initiated by the purchaser before transferring the firearm to the
purchaser if the purchaser is older than seventeen (17) years of age but younger than
twenty-one (21) years of age.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to any transactions made on or after that date.
SB1104
003205
- 1 -